Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.962

State fire service mobilization—State fire services mobilization plan—State fire resources coordinator.

The director of fire protection shall review and make recommendations to the chief on the refinement and maintenance of the Washington state fire services mobilization plan, which shall include the procedures to be used during fire and other emergencies for coordinating local, regional, and state fire jurisdiction resources. In carrying out this duty, the director of fire protection shall consult with and solicit recommendations from representatives of state and local fire and emergency management organizations, regional fire defense boards, and the department of natural resources. The Washington state fire services mobilization plan shall be consistent with, and made part of, the Washington state comprehensive emergency management plan. The chief shall review the fire services mobilization plan as submitted by the director of fire protection, recommend changes that may be necessary, and approve the fire services mobilization plan for inclusion within the state comprehensive emergency management plan.

It is the responsibility of the chief to mobilize jurisdictions under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan. The state fire marshal shall serve as the state fire resources coordinator when the Washington state fire services mobilization plan is mobilized.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 47; 2003 c 405 s 3; 1997 c 49 s 10; 1995 c 269 s 1101; 1992 c 117 s 11. Formerly RCW 38.54.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—Part headings not law—Severability—1995 c 269: See notes following RCW 18.16.050.

Findings—1992 c 117: See note following RCW 35.21.775.